Maryland, session 2025, SB0767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–318.
(a) This section applies only in Calvert County.
(c) (1) The Sheriff may appoint deputy sheriffs and correctional deputies in
the number and at the salary approved by the County Commissioners OR PRESCRIBED IN
A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT, AS APPLICABLE, PROVIDED THAT ANY
– 1 –

Ch. 132 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ADDITIONAL FUNDING REQUIRED DUE TO THE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
AGREEMENT IS SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS.
(H) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO ALL FULL–TIME DEPUTY
SHERIFFS AND CORRECTIONAL DEPUTIES IN THE CALVERT COUNTY SHERIFF’S
OFFICE AT THE RANK OF MAJOR AND BELOW.
(2) SWORN DEPUTY SHERIFFS AND CORRECTIONAL DEPUTIES
SUBJECT TO THIS SUBSECTION SHALL HAVE THE RIGHT TO ORGANIZE AND
NEGOTIATE WITH THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS AND THE SHERIFF WITH REGARD
TO WAGES AND EMPLOYEE HEALTH CARE PREMIUM SHARE NOT REGULATED BY THE
SHERIFF.
(3) THE TERMS OF ANY AGREEMENT WITH REGARD TO WAGES AND
EMPLOYEE HEALTH CARE PREMIUM SHARE NOT REGULATED BY THE SHERIFF
SHALL BE SET FORTH IN A MEMORANDUM OF AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO BETWEEN
THE SHERIFF, THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS, AND THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION
THAT IS CERTIFIED AS THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE IN ACCORDANCE WITH A
PROCESS AGREED TO BY THE PARTIES.
(4) AN AGREEMENT WITH REGARD TO WAGES AND EMPLOYEE
HEALTH CARE PREMIUM SHARE NOT REGULATED BY THE SHERIFF IS NOT
EFFECTIVE UNTIL THE AGREEMENT IS RATIFIED BY:
(I) THE SHERIFF;
(II) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS; AND
(III) THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE.
(5) A MODIFICATION TO AN EXISTING MEMORANDUM OF AGREEMENT
IS NOT VALID UNLESS THE MODIFICATION IS IN WRITING AND RATIFIED BY:
(I) THE SHERIFF;
(II) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS; AND
(III) THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE MAY:
(I) TAKE PART OR REFRAIN FROM TAKING PART IN FORMING,
JOINING, SUPPORTING, OR PARTICIPATING IN A LABOR ORGANIZATION OR ITS
LAWFUL ACTIVITIES;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 132
(II) SELECT A LABOR ORGANIZATION AS THEIR EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE;
(III) ENGAGE IN COLLECTIVE BARGAINING WITH THE SHERIFF
AND THE COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR CONCERNING WAGES AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS
THROUGH A LABOR ORGANIZATION CERTIFIED AS THEIR EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE;
(IV) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ENTER
INTO A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT, THROUGH THE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE, COVERING THOSE WAGES AND BENEFITS; AND
(V) DECERTIFY A LABOR ORGANIZATION AS THEIR EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE.
(3) ANY ADDITIONAL FUNDING REQUIRED AS A RESULT OF A
NEGOTIATED COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT IS SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY
THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS.
(4) (I) A LABOR ORGANIZATION SHALL BE DEEMED CERTIFIED AS
THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE IF THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS ARE MET:
1. A PETITION FOR THE LABOR ORGANIZATION TO BE
RECOGNIZED BY THE SHERIFF IS SIGNED BY AT LEAST 51% OF THE SWORN DEPUTY
SHERIFFS AT THE RANK OF SERGEANT AND BELOW INDICATING THEIR DESIRE TO BE
EXCLUSIVELY REPRESENTED BY THE PETITIONER FOR THE PURPOSE OF
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING; AND
2. THE PETITION IS SUBMITTED TO THE SHERIFF.
(II) IF THE SHERIFF DOES NOT CHALLENGE THE VALIDITY OF
THE PETITION WITHIN 20 CALENDAR DAYS FOLLOWING RECEIPT OF THE PETITION,
THE LABOR ORGANIZATION SHALL BE DEEMED CERTIFIED AS THE EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE.
(III) IF THE SHERIFF CHALLENGES THE VALIDITY OF THE
PETITION, THE AMERICAN ARBITRATION ASSOCIATION SHALL BE REQUESTED TO
APPOINT A THIRD–PARTY NEUTRAL ARBITRATOR TO CONDUCT A SECRET BALLOT
ELECTION AND TO CERTIFY WHETHER THE LABOR ORGANIZATION HAS BEEN
SELECTED AS THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE BY A 51% VOTE OF THE SWORN
DEPUTY SHERIFFS AND CORRECTIONAL DEPUTIES WITH THE RANK OF MAJOR AND
BELOW.
– 3 –

Ch. 132 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE AMERICAN
ARBITRATION ASSOCIATION AND THE THIRD–PARTY NEUTRAL ARBITRATOR SHALL
BE SHARED EQUALLY BY THE PARTIES.
(5) (I) FOLLOWING THE CERTIFICATION OF AN EXCLUSIVE
REPRESENTATIVE AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
PARTIES SHALL MEET AT REASONABLE TIMES AND ENGAGE IN COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING IN GOOD FAITH.
(II) THE PARTIES SHALL MAKE EVERY REASONABLE EFFORT TO
CONCLUDE NEGOTIATIONS IN A TIMELY MANNER TO ALLOW FOR INCLUSION BY THE
SHERIFF’S OFFICE OF MATTERS AGREED ON IN ITS BUDGET REQUEST.
(III) THE SHERIFF AND THE COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR MAY NOT
BE REQUIRED TO ENGAGE IN COLLECTIVE BARGAINING NEGOTIATIONS WITH THE
EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE AFTER THE TIME THAT THE COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS APPROVE THE ANNUAL OPERATING BUDGET WITH REGARD TO
CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT REQUIRING THE APPROPRIATION OF FUNDS IN THE
ANNUAL OPERATING BUDGET.
(6) (I) A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT SHALL CONTAIN
ALL MATTERS OF AGREEMENT REACHED IN THE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
PROCESS.
(II) THE AGREEMENT MAY CONTAIN A GRIEVANCE PROCEDURE
PROVIDING FOR NONBINDING ARBITRATION OR GRIEVANCES.
(III) AN AGREEMENT REACHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE IN WRITING AND SIGNED BY THE DESIGNATED
REPRESENTATIVES OF THE PARTIES INVOLVED IN THE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
PROCESS.
(IV) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (V) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AN
AGREEMENT IS NOT EFFECTIVE UNTIL IT IS RATIFIED BY A MAJORITY OF VOTES
CAST BY THE MEMBERS IN THE BARGAINING UNIT, THE SHERIFF, AND THE COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS.
(V) ADDITIONAL FUNDING, IF ANY, REQUIRED AS A RESULT OF
THE AGREEMENT SHALL BE SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY THE COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS.
(VI) THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE, THE SHERIFF, AND THE
COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR MAY EACH DESIGNATE AT LEAST ONE BUT NOT MORE
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 132
THAN FOUR INDIVIDUALS FOR REPRESENTATION IN COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
NEGOTIATIONS.
(VII) AN AGREEMENT IS NOT VALID IF IT EXTENDS FOR LESS
THAN 1 YEAR OR MORE THAN 4 YEARS.
(7) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED AS AUTHORIZING OR
OTHERWISE ALLOWING A CORRECTIONAL DEPUTY TO ENGAGE IN A STRIKE AS
DEFINED IN § 3–303 OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 5 –